Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (1), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium  ending June 30, 2023, for central services, is increased by $8,000,000 to re-
balance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs, is  increased by
$7,053,076 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for child welfare programs, is decreased by  $11,022,962
to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for aging and people with disabilities programs,  is
decreased by $41,021,547 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other provision  of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Department of Human Services by section 1  (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021,
for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for intellectual/developmental disabilities programs,
is decreased by $54,063,391 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of  Human Services, for self-sufficiency programs, is decreased by $15,646 to rebalance
the agency’s budget.
SECTION 7. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 2 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 1
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts and Medicare receipts  and including federal
funds for indirect cost recovery,  Social Security Supplemental Security Income recoveries
and the Child Care and Development Fund,  but excluding lottery funds and federal funds not
described in section 2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or received by  the Depart-
ment of Human Services, for child welfare programs, is decreased by $169,988  to rebalance
the agency’s budget.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on  ex-
penditures established by section 3 (5), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for child  welfare programs, is decreased by
$3,854,006 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 9. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 3 (6), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from  federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section 2, chapter 606,  Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department  of Human Services, for aging and people with disabilities pro-
grams, is decreased by $91,001,900 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 3 (7), chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 606, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Department of Human Services, for intellectual/developmental disabilities
programs, is increased by $28,961,764 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 11.
Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section  1 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for health  systems, health policy and analytics, and public
health, is decreased by $135,228,179 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for central services, state assessments and enterprise-
wide costs, is decreased by $14,013,925 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 13. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 1  (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for
the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for the Oregon State Hospital, is increased by  $6,678,251
to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 14. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the General Fund appropriation
made to the Oregon Health Authority by section 11, chapter 554, Oregon  Laws 2021, for the
biennium ending June 30, 2023, for carrying out  the amendments to ORS 413.201 and 414.231
by sections 1 and  2, chapter 554, Oregon Laws 2021, is increased by $4,045,761 to rebalance
the agency’s budget.
SECTION 15. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by  section 2 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for the biennium
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum  limit for payment of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana  tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by  the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and
analytics, and public health, is increased by $8,617 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 16. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 2 (2), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 2
ending June 30, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment  of expenses from fees, moneys or
other revenues, including  Miscellaneous Receipts, tobacco tax receipts, marijuana tax re-
ceipts, beer and wine tax receipts, provider taxes and Medicare receipts, but excluding  lot-
tery funds and federal funds not described in section 2, chapter 668, Oregon  Laws 2021,
collected or received by the Oregon Health Authority, for the  Oregon State Hospital, is de-
creased by $6,678,251 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 17. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (1), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for health systems, health policy and analytics, and
public health, is decreased by $353,697,133 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 18. Notwithstanding any other law  limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 5 (3), chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, for  the biennium
ending June 30,  2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses from federal funds,
excluding federal funds described in section  2, chapter 668, Oregon Laws 2021, collected or
received by the Oregon Health Authority, for central services, state assessments and
enterprise-wide costs, is increased by $3,000,000 to rebalance the agency’s budget.
SECTION 19.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House May 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5047 (HB 5047-A) Page 3